New Jersey, session 221, A2673.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.3B:3-2 is amended to read as follows: 3B:3-2.   Execution; witnessed wills; writings intended as wills. a.     Except as provided in subsection b. of this section and in N.J.S.3B:3-3, a will shall be: (1)   in writing; (2)   signed by the testator or in the testator's name by some other individual in the testator's conscious presence and at the testator's direction; and (3)   signed by at least two individuals, each of whom signed within a reasonable time after each witnessed either the signing of the will as described in paragraph (2) or the testator's acknowledgment of that signature or acknowledgment of the will. b.    A will that does not comply with subsection a. is valid as a writing intended as a will, whether or not witnessed, if the signature and material portions of the document are in the testator's handwriting. c.     Intent that the document constitutes the testator's will can be established by extrinsic evidence, including for writings intended as wills, portions of the document that are not in the testator's handwriting. (cf: P.L.2005, c.160, s.2) 2.    N.J.S.3B:3-3 is amended to read as follows: 3B:3-3.    Writings intended as wills. Although a document or writing added upon a document was not executed in compliance with N.J.S.3B:3-2, the document or writing is treated as if it had been executed in compliance with N.J.S.3B:3-2 if: a.     the document or writing is signed by the testator or is substantially in the testators handwriting; and b.    the proponent of the document or writing establishes by clear and convincing evidence that the decedent intended the document or writing to constitute: (1) the decedent's will; (2) a partial or complete revocation of the will; (3) an addition to or an alteration of the will; or (4) a partial or complete revival of his formerly revoked will or of a formerly revoked portion of the will. (cf: P.L.2005, c.160, s.3) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall be applicable to any will or other document purporting to be a will filed with the Surrogate on or after the effective date.